Utah statutes.
76-6-206.   Criminal trespass.
(1)  As used in this section, "enter" means intrusion of the entire body.
(2)  A person is guilty of criminal trespass if, under circumstances not
amounting to burglary as defined in Section 76-6-202, 76-6-203, or 76-6-204 or
a violation of Section 76-10-2402 regarding commercial obstruction:
(a)  the person enters or remains unlawfully on property and:
(i)  intends to cause annoyance or injury to any person or damage to any
property, including the use of graffiti as defined in Section 76-6-107;
(ii)  intends to commit any crime, other than theft or a felony; or
(iii)  is reckless as to whether his presence will cause fear for the safety
of another;
(b)  knowing the person's entry or presence is unlawful, the person enters or
remains on property as to which notice against entering is given by:
(i)  personal communication to the actor by the owner or someone with apparent
authority to act for the owner;
(ii)  fencing or other enclosure obviously designed to exclude intruders; or
(iii)  posting of signs reasonably likely to come to the attention of
intruders; or
(c)  the person enters a condominium unit in violation of Subsection
57-8-7(7).
(3) (a)  A violation of Subsection (2)(a) or (b) is a class B misdemeanor
unless it was committed in a dwelling, in which event it is a class A
misdemeanor.
(b)  A violation of Subsection (2)(c) is an infraction.
(4)  It is a defense to prosecution under this section that:
(a)  the property was open to the public when the actor entered or remained;
and
(b)  the actor's conduct did not substantially interfere with the owner's use
of the property.
